Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 8. Pension Obligation Bonds.

Sec. 37.15.900.
Bond authorization.

For purposes of financing prepayment of all or a portion of a governmental employer’s share of unfunded accrued actuarial liability of retirement systems, including the costs of issuance and administration, the issuance and sale of bonds of the state by the committee is authorized as provided in this section and AS

37.15.903

—

37.15.955

, but only after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under (e) of this section and if the state bond rating is the equivalent of AA- or better. The net proceeds of the sale of the bonds remaining after payment of costs of issuance and administration shall be transferred to the commissioner of administration for the account of the governmental employer whose share of unfunded accrued actuarial liability is to be prepaid for application to that liability. Accrued interest paid on the bonds shall be paid into the pension obligation bond redemption fund.

The total unpaid principal amount of bonds, including refunding bonds, but excluding refunded bonds, is limited as provided in AS

37.15.903

. The bonds do not constitute a general obligation of the state. Authorization by the voters of the state or the legislature is not required.

The committee may enter into agreements with other state agencies as necessary or convenient to implement this section and AS

37.15.903

—

37.15.955

.

The committee may contract for the services of underwriters, paying agents, trustees, bond printers, rating agencies, bond insurance, credit enhancement providers, accountants, financial advisors, and bond counsel, and for other services as are necessary to accomplish the bond issuance and sale.

Before the issuance and sale of bonds under this section, the committee shall submit a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee for review, and 45 days shall elapse before bonds are issued and sold, unless the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee earlier recommends that the committee proceed with the issuance. Should the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee recommend within the 45-day period that the committee not proceed with the issuance and sale of bonds, the committee shall again review the proposal, and, if the committee decides to issue and sell the bonds, the committee shall provide the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee with a statement of the committee’s reasons for doing so before issuance under this section.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008; am §§ 3, 4 ch 109 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective December 26, 2018, in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under (e) of this section and” following “but only”; added (e).

Sec. 37.15.903.
Pension obligation bond limit.

The total unpaid principal amount of bonds, including refunding bonds, but excluding refunded bonds, issued by all state entities added together, for the purposes of financing prepayment of all or a portion of a governmental employer’s share of unfunded accrued liability of retirement systems, may not exceed $1,500,000,000 or a funding ratio of actuarial assets to accrued liability greater than 85 percent, whichever is less.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 5 ch 109 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective December 26, 2018, substituted “may not exceed $1,500,000,000 or a funding ratio of actuarial assets to accrued liability greater than 85 percent, whichever is less” for “may not exceed $5,000,000,000”.

Sec. 37.15.905.
Bond redemption fund.

There is established a special fund of the state, known as the pension obligation bond redemption fund, which is a trust fund for paying and securing the payment of the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds, and which shall be at all times completely segregated and set apart from all other funds of the state. The bond redemption fund shall be drawn on only for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds, together with related trustee fees, if any.

Money in the bond redemption fund may be invested in the same manner and on the same conditions as permitted for investing of money belonging to the state or held in the treasury under AS

37.10.070

; however, the committee may agree with the bondholders to further limit these investments. Earnings on investments must be retained in the bond redemption fund.

Separate accounts may be created in the bond redemption fund for the purposes of paying and securing the bonds. The accounts may be combined for purposes of investment and for financial support to achieve the purposes of AS

37.15.910(c)

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.910.
Bond terms.

The bonds may be issued and sold at public or negotiated sale in the manner, in the amounts or series, and at the time or times that the committee determines. The bonds, or each series of them, shall be sold at the price and on the terms, conditions, and covenants set by the committee after considering market conditions. Interest rates may be fixed or variable.

The bonds mature at the time or times fixed by the committee. The bonds may be subject to redemption before their fixed maturities, as determined by the committee, with or without a premium or premiums. The bonds may be in denominations determined by the committee; may be issued in fully or partially registered form; must be payable as to principal and interest at the place or places determined by the committee; must be signed on behalf of the state in the manner provided by the committee; and must be issued under and subject to the terms, conditions, covenants, and protective features safeguarding payment of the bonds as found necessary by the committee.

If the committee finds it reasonably necessary, the committee may select a trustee or trustees for the holders of the bonds, or any series of them, for the safeguarding and disbursement of any of the money in the bond redemption fund or for duties with respect to the enforcement, authentication, delivery, payment, and registration of the bonds as the committee may determine. The committee shall fix the rights, duties, powers, and obligations of the trustee or trustees.

In its determination of all matters and questions relating to the issuance and sale of the bonds and the fixing of their maturities, terms, conditions, and covenants as provided in (a) of this section, the decisions of the committee shall be those that are reasonably necessary for the best interests of the state and its inhabitants and that will accomplish the most advantageous sale of the bonds. Decisions of the committee, as expressed in a bond resolution, are final and are conclusively considered to comply with the requirements of AS

37.15.900

—

37.15.955

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.915.
Bond resolution.

The committee shall authorize the issuance of bonds by adopting a resolution and shall prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds or any part or series of them. The bond resolution must fix the principal amount, denominations, date, maturities, manner of sale, place or places of payment, rights of redemption, if any, terms, form, conditions, and covenants of the bonds or each series of them.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.920.
Enforcement by bond owner.

The owner or owners of not less than 10 percent of the aggregate principal amount of any series or issue of bonds or the trustee for the owners of the bonds or any series of them may, by appropriate proceedings in state court, require and compel the transfer, setting aside, and payment of money and the enforcement of all of the terms, conditions, and covenants as required and provided in AS

37.15.900

—

37.15.955

, as appropriate, and the bond resolution.

A proceeding under (a) of this section may be commenced and conducted only in the Superior Court for the State of Alaska, First Judicial District at Juneau.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.925.
Amounts required for payments.

The committee shall, before June 30 of each year or from time to time within the year, as appropriate, commencing with the year in which the bonds are issued, certify to the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of administration the amounts required in the current fiscal year and the next ensuing fiscal year by the bond resolution or resolutions to be paid from the general fund into the bond redemption fund and to be paid into and maintained in any reserve fund or account or other fund or account created by the bond resolution or resolutions, and shall also certify to the commissioners the last date or dates on which payments may be made.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.930.
Purposes and sufficiency of revenue.

The proceeds of bonds may be used for the purposes described in AS

37.15.900(a)

, as appropriate. Bonds may not be issued unless the committee first finds that the actuarially assumed rate of return on the funds managed by the Alaska Retirement Management Board is projected to exceed the true interest cost to be paid on the bonds by at least 1.5 percent annually.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.935.
Refunding.

The committee may refund the bonds or any part of them at or before their maturities or redemption dates by the issuance of refunding bonds of the state if the state bond rating is the equivalent of AA- or better and if, in the opinion of the committee, refunding is advantageous to and in the best interest of the state and its inhabitants.

The issuance of refunding bonds need not be authorized by the voters of the state or by an act of the legislature. The committee shall adopt the resolution or resolutions and prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, exchange or sale, and delivery of the refunding bonds. All provisions of AS

37.15.900

—

37.15.955

are applicable to the refunding bonds and to the issuance, sale, or exchange of them, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide money for the advance or current refunding of all bonds to be refunded and interest on the refunded bonds and, in addition, for the payment of all costs of issuance and administration of the refunding bonds. These expenses also include the difference in amount between the par value of the refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the refunding bonds are sold; the premium, if any, necessary to be paid to call or retire the outstanding bonds and the interest accruing on them to the date of the call or retirement; and other of these costs. The committee is authorized to incur expenses to carry out this section.

The committee may contract with a refunding trustee to hold the proceeds of refunding bonds in trust until the proceeds, together with earnings on the proceeds, are applied to pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds to be refunded. Until the refunding bond proceeds are applied, the proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States or an agency or corporation of the United States whose obligations constitute direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.940.
Bonds as legal investments.

The bonds are legal investments for all banks, trust companies, savings banks, savings and loan associations, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. The bonds may be accepted as security for deposits of all money of the state and its political subdivisions.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.945.
Statutory construction.

AS

37.15.900

—

37.15.955

shall be liberally construed to carry out the purposes for which they were enacted.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.950.
Regulations.

The committee may adopt regulations necessary to implement the provisions of AS

37.15.900

—

37.15.955

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.15.955.
Definitions.

In AS

37.15.900

—

37.15.955

,

“bond redemption fund” means the pension obligation bond redemption fund established in AS

37.15.905

;

“bond resolution” means a resolution or resolutions adopted by the committee under AS

37.15.915

authorizing the issuance of bonds;

“bonds” means the pension obligation bonds authorized in AS

37.15.900

—

37.15.955

;

“committee” means the state bond committee created in AS

37.15.110

or any other committee, body, department, or officer of the state that succeeds to the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the state bond committee by law;

“costs of issuance and administration” means all costs associated with issuance and administration of pension obligation bonds and refunding bonds, including costs of bond printing, official statements, financial advisors, travel costs, rating agencies, bond insurance, letters and lines of credit for credit enhancement, underwriters, legal services, paying agents, bond registrars, bond and escrow trustees, arbitrage rebate, and all other costs, including administrative costs, both direct and indirect.

History.

(§ 8 ch 35 SLA 2008)